Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.160.080

School buses, rental or lease for emergency purposes—Authorization.

It is the intent of the legislature and the purpose of RCW 28A.160.010, 28A.160.080, and 28A.160.090 that in the event of major forest fires, floods, or other natural emergencies that boards of directors of school districts, in their discretion, may rent or lease school buses to governmental agencies for the purposes of transporting personnel, supplies and/or evacuees.

[ 1990 c 33 s 136; 1971 c 24 s 1. Formerly RCW 28A.24.170.]